Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1717
Sale or purchase of commodity; prohibited; exception.

Except as otherwise provided in section 8-1718 or 8-1719, no person shall sell or purchase or offer to sell or purchase any commodity under any commodity contract or under any commodity option or offer to enter into or enter into as seller or purchaser any commodity contract or any commodity option.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 17.